Utah statutes.
78B-15-311.   Forms for declaration and denial of paternity and for rescission of paternity.

(1)  To facilitate compliance with this part, the Office of Vital Records shall prescribe forms for the declaration, denial, and rescission of paternity.

(2)  A valid declaration of paternity or denial of paternity is not affected by a later modification of the prescribed form.

